Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-818
Death of candidate; removal of name from ballot.

The Secretary of State, election commissioner, county clerk, or city or village clerk may remove a name from the ballot upon personal knowledge or proof of death at any time prior to the actual printing of the ballot even if the notice of election has been published containing the name of such deceased candidate or nominee.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 239.